Washington statutes.
RCW 9.68.030

Indecent articles, etc.

Every person who shall expose for sale, loan or distribution, any instrument or article, or any drug or medicine, for causing unlawful abortion; or shall write, print, distribute or exhibit any card, circular, pamphlet, advertisement or notice of any kind, stating when, where, how or of whom such article or medicine can be obtained, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 185 s 2; 1909 c 249 s 208; RRS s 2460.]